Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5346.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the following in lines 331 through 336:- 
“A transfer of standardized computer software, including but not limited to electronic, 
telephonic or similar transfer, shall also be considered a transfer of tangible personal property. 
The commissioner may, by regulation, provide rules for apportioning tax in those instances in 
which software is transferred for use in more than one state.” 
SECTION 2. Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting the following new subsection:- 
“(yy) Sales of a transfer of standardized computer software, including but not limited to 
electronic, telephonic or similar transfer that is downloaded, installed, or accessed online.” 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.